Utah, session 2026, SB193.
Section 1. Section 53G-4-416 is enacted to read:53G-4-416. School district prioritization of school breaks to coincide with state holy days.Starting with the 2027-28 school year, when setting the schedule for a school year, a school district shall, to the extent possible, prioritize scheduling school breaks to coincide with Good Friday and other state holy days described in Section 63G-1-1101.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53G-5-415 is enacted to read:53G-5-415. Charter school prioritization of school breaks to coincide with state holy days.Starting with the 2027-28 school year, when setting the schedule for a school year, a charter school shall, to the extent possible, prioritize scheduling school breaks to coincide with Good Friday and other state holy days described in Section 63G-1-1101.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53H-3-1304 is enacted to read:53H-3-1304. Institution of higher education prioritization of school breaks to coincide with state holy days.Starting with the 2027-28 school year, when setting the schedule for a school year, an institution of higher education shall, to the extent possible, prioritize scheduling school breaks to coincide with Good Friday and other state holy days described in Section 63G-1-1101.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 63G-1-301 is amended to read:63G-1-301. Legal holidays -- Personal preference day -- Governor authorized to declare additional legal holidays.(1)The following days are legal holidays in Utah:(a)except as provided in Subsection (2)(a) or (b):(i)January 1, New Year's Day;(ii)July 4, Independence Day;(iii)July 24, Pioneer Day;(iv)November 11, Veterans Day;(v)December 25, Christmas; and(vi)a day designated by proclamation issued by the president of the United States or the governor as a day of fasting or thanksgiving;(b)(i)the first Sunday after the first full moon that occurs on or after the spring equinox, Easter Sunday;(ii)(i)the third Monday of January, Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. Day;(iii)(ii)the third Monday of February, Washington and LincolnPresidents' Day;(iii)subject to Subsection (6), the Friday preceding Easter Sunday, Good Friday;(iv)the first Sunday after the first full moon that occurs on or after the spring equinox, Easter Sunday;(iv)(v)the last Monday of May, Memorial Day;(v)(vi)the first Monday of September, Labor Day;(vi)(vii)the second Monday of October, Columbus Day;(vii)(viii)the fourth Thursday of November, Thanksgiving Day; and(viii)(ix)except as provided in Subsection (2)(c) or (d), June 19, Juneteenth National Freedom Day; and(c)except as provided in Subsection (3), every Sunday.(2)(a)If a day described in Subsection (1)(a) falls on a Saturday, the preceding Friday is the legal holiday.(b)If a day described in Subsection (1)(a) falls on a Sunday, the following Monday is the legal holiday.(c)If June 19 falls on a Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, or Friday, the preceding Monday is the legal holiday.(d)If June 19 falls on Saturday or Sunday, the following Monday is the legal holiday.(3)For purposes of Utah Constitution, Article VI, Section 16, Subsection (1), regarding the exclusion of state holidays from the 45-day legislative general session, Sunday is not considered a state holiday.(4)Each employee may select one additional day, called Personal Preference Day, to be scheduled in accordance with rules made, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, by the Division of Human Resource Management, which the employee may use to observe a state holy day, as described in Section 63G-1-1101, or any other day the employee chooses to recognize.(5)(a)If, in the governor's opinion, extraordinary conditions exist justifying the action, the governor may:(i)declare, by proclamation, legal holidays in addition to those legal holidays described in Subsections (1) and (2); or(ii)limit the legal holidays described in Subsection (5)(a)(i) to certain classes of business and activities to be designated by the governor.(b)Except as provided in Subsection (5)(c), a legal holiday described in Subsection (5)(a) may not extend for a longer period than 60 consecutive days.(c)The governor may, by proclamation:(i)renew a legal holiday described in Subsection (5)(a) for one or more periods not exceeding 30 days each as the governor determines necessary; or(ii)terminate a legal holiday described under Subsection (5)(a) or (b) earlier than the time period described in a preceding proclamation.(6) A state employee who receives paid time off for a legal holiday will, for Good Friday, receive four hours of paid time off rather than the standard eight hours.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 63G-1-1101 is amended to read:63G-1-1101. State holy days.(1)As used in this section, "state holy day" means an annual day or other time period of special religious significance that the state officially recognizes and observes as a holy day under this section.(2)A state holy day is not a legal holiday or state holiday, unless the state holy day is also designated as a legal holiday under Section 63G-1-301.(3)The following are state holy days:(a)Holi, on the last full moon day of the Hindu lunisolar month of Phalguna;(b)Lunar New Year, from the lunar calendar's first new moon through the lunar calendar's first full moon;(c)Good Friday, on the Friday preceding Easter Sunday;(d)Easter Sunday, on the first Sunday after the first full moon that occurs on or after the spring equinox;(e)Eid al-Fitr, on the first day of the Islamic lunar month of Shawwal;(f)Passover, for eight days, starting on the fifteenth day of the Hebrew lunisolar month of Nisan;(g)Vesak Day, on the first full moon of the Hindu lunisolar month of Vaisakha;(h)Eid al-Adha, on the tenth day of the Islamic lunar month of Dhu al-Hijjah;(i)Rosh Hashanah, on the first two days of the Hebrew lunisolar month of Tishrei;(j)Yom Kippur, on the tenth day of the Hebrew lunisolar month of Tishrei;(k)Diwali, on the fifteenth day of the Hindu lunisolar month of Kartik; and(l)Christmas, on December 25.(4)A state government entity or local government entity shall place a high priority on approving an employee's request to take personal leave on a state holy day.

Section 6:
Section 6.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.